Illinois, session 104th, HB2915.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Interscholastic Athletic Organization Act 5is amended by adding Section 1.30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 25/1.30 new)7    Sec. 1.30. Designation of team or sport based on 8biological sex.9    (a) Any athletic team or sport that is under the 10jurisdiction of an association or other entity that has as one 11of its purposes promoting, sponsoring, regulating, or in any 12manner providing for interscholastic athletics or any form of 13athletic competition among schools and students within this 14State must abide by the following: if an athletic team or sport 15is designated as being female, it is available only to 16participants who are female, based on their biological sex. 17    (b) Once each school year and before allowing a student to 18participate on an athletic team or sport, the school district 19or nonpublic school that the student attends shall obtain a 20written statement verifying all of the following: 21        (1) The student's age.22        (2) The student's biological sex, as ascertained at or 23    before birth in accordance with the student's genetics and   HB2915- 2 -LRB104 12046 LNS 22141 b1    reproductive biology.2        (3) That the student is not taking and has not taken 3    during the preceding 12 months any performance enhancing 4    drugs, including anabolic steroids. 5    The statement must be signed by the student's parent or 6guardian if the student is under the age of 18 years or by the 7student if the student is 18 years of age or older. 8    (c) If the school district or nonpublic school that the 9student attends has reasonable cause to believe that any 10information provided in accordance with this Section is false 11or misleading, the school district or nonpublic school may 12remove the student from any sport or athletic team and 13prohibit the student's participation in any sport or on any 14athletic team for the duration of the school year.15    (d) A governmental entity or an association or other 16entity that has as one of its purposes promoting, sponsoring, 17regulating, or in any manner providing for interscholastic 18athletics or any form of athletic competition among schools 19and students within this State may not entertain a complaint, 20open an investigation, or take any adverse action against a 21school district or nonpublic school for maintaining athletic 22teams or sports in accordance with this Section.